Vermont statutes. Title 1 General Provisions
Subchapter 4. Effect of Statutes

§ 211.
Official acts and resolutions.

The acts and resolutions printed or reproduced under

29 V.S.A. § 1115

shall be taken to be the laws and resolutions of the session of the General Assembly at which they were passed, unless the original act and legislative records show otherwise, in which case the original act and legislative records pertaining thereto shall control.

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 90

, § 1.

§ 212.
Effective date of laws.

Laws enacted by the General Assembly shall take effect on July 1 next following the date of their passage, unless it is otherwise specifically provided.

HISTORY:

Amended

1961, No. 228

, § 1, eff. July 21, 1961;

1969, No. 207

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 1971.

§ 213.
Pending suits unaffected.

No act of the General Assembly shall affect a suit begun or pending at the time of its passage, except acts regulating practice in court, relating to the competency of witnesses, or relating to amendments of process or pleadings.

HISTORY:

Amended

2015, No. 97

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 214.
Effect of amendment or repeal.

The amendment or repeal of an act or of a provision of the Vermont Statutes Annotated shall not revive an act or statutory provision which has been repealed.

The amendment or repeal of an act or statutory provision, except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, shall not:

affect the operation of the act or provision prior to the effective date of the amendment or repeal thereof;

affect any right, privilege, obligation, or liability acquired, accrued, or incurred prior to the effective date of the amendment or repeal;

affect any violation of the act or provision amended or repealed, or any penalty or forfeiture incurred thereunder, prior to the effective date of the amendment or repeal;

affect any suit, remedy, or proceeding to enforce or give effect to any right, privilege, obligation, or liability acquired, incurred, or accrued under the amended or repealed provision prior to the effective date of the amendment or repeal; and the suit, remedy, or proceeding may be instituted, prosecuted, or continued as if the act or provision had not been repealed or amended.

If the penalty or punishment for any offense is reduced by the amendment of an act or statutory provision, the same shall be imposed in accordance with the act or provision as amended unless imposed prior to the date of the amendment.

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 207

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. March 24, 1970.

§ 215.
Severability of provisions.

The provisions of any act are severable.
If any provision of an act is invalid, or if any application thereof to any person or circumstance is invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 16

, § 12, eff. March 11, 1969.